srcV2/esu.lexc
!                                      |                                        |                                         |
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|

LEXICON DimensionalRoot
aki             DimensionalPostbase; ! value*
akur            DimensionalPostbase; ! length of a garment*
amel            DimensionalPostbase; ! width, especially of a creek
cacet           DimensionalPostbase; ! fortitude
cace(t)         DimensionalPostbase; ! fortitude
cas             DimensionalPostbase; ! fortitude
taces           DimensionalPostbase; ! fortitude
cug             DimensionalPostbase; ! human height
sug             DimensionalPostbase; ! human height
elur            DimensionalPostbase; ! width, especially of a garment 
lur             DimensionalPostbase; ! width, especially of a garment 
ilu             DimensionalPostbase; ! interior capacity or size*
imar            DimensionalPostbase; ! capacity*
iq              DimensionalPostbase; ! width
kanag           DimensionalPostbase; ! leg length
lur             DimensionalPostbase; ! width, especially of a garment 
elur            DimensionalPostbase; ! width, especially of a garment 
mam             DimensionalPostbase; ! thickness
mar             DimensionalPostbase; ! length, distance overland
mig             DimensionalPostbase; ! loudness of a thudding noise
mis             DimensionalPostbase; ! perceptibility 
marrlu          DimensionalPostbase; ! depth of a net 
nequ            DimensionalPostbase; ! width
qas             DimensionalPostbase; ! loudness
qecig           DimensionalPostbase; ! thickness of a skin, cloth, etc.* 
qer             DimensionalPostbase; ! height
qur             DimensionalPostbase; ! height
sug             DimensionalPostbase; ! human height
cug             DimensionalPostbase; ! human height
tume            DimensionalPostbase; ! foot length*
tuner           DimensionalPostbase; ! impact
umyuar          DimensionalPostbase; ! mental ability*
usvi            DimensionalPostbase; ! wisdom, cleverness* 
uyvi            DimensionalPostbase; ! wisdom, cleverness* 
uya             DimensionalPostbase; ! width, especially of a river*

LEXICON DimensionalPostbase
-+tu[N→V]:%<+tu          VerbPostbase; ! to be well endowed with N, to have N to a large extent
-+kite²[N→V]:%<+kite°    VerbPostbase; ! to have N to a small degree; to have only a small amount of N 

LEXICON EmotionalPostbase
-–ke⁴[V→V]:%<–k̲e               VerbPostbase; ! to feel V toward (him/it); to V (object)
-@~+narqe[V→V]:%<@¹~+narqe     VerbPostbase; ! to tend to cause one to V; to be able to be V-ed
-@~+naite[V→V]:%<@¹~+naite     VerbPostbase; ! to tend not to cause one to V
-+tar¹[V→V]:%<+tar             VerbPostbase; ! to tend by oneʼs disposition or nature to V a lot
-+taite²[V→V]:%<+taite°        VerbPostbase; ! to tend by oneʼs disposition or nature not to V
-@~+yug[V→V]:%<@ʸ~+yug         VerbPostbase; ! to want to V; to tend to V; to feel V (with “emotional roots”)


LEXICON PosturalPostbase
QuantQualInflection;
-+te²[V→V]:%<+te            VerbPostbase; ! to act on one so as to cause it to V
-@–ngqa[V→V]:%<@⁵–ngqa      VerbPostbase; ! to be in a state of V or of having V-ed or having been V-ed
-@–ngqa[V→V]:%<@⁵–ngqar     QuantQualInflection; ! to be in a state of V or of having V-ed or having been V-ed

LEXICON EmotionalRoot
aar             EmotionalPostbase; ! frightened, endangered
alag            EmotionalPostbase; ! finding something feasible 
alia            EmotionalPostbase; ! lonely
alai            EmotionalPostbase; ! lonely
ancurtu         EmotionalPostbase; ! hesitant*
ancurtur        EmotionalPostbase; ! hesitant*
asgura          EmotionalPostbase; ! doubting
augtar          EmotionalPostbase; ! inhibited
canga           EmotionalPostbase; ! disliking
caperr          EmotionalPostbase; ! finding something difficult 
cikna           EmotionalPostbase; ! jealous*
cumaci          EmotionalPostbase; ! repulsed
ekli            EmotionalPostbase; ! sexually attracted, lustful 
elingra         EmotionalPostbase; ! grateful
eq'u            EmotionalPostbase; ! hating
iilla           EmotionalPostbase; ! amazed
ira             EmotionalPostbase; ! amazed
irra            EmotionalPostbase; ! amazed
kama            EmotionalPostbase; ! suspicious
kasngu          EmotionalPostbase; ! ashamed, embarrassed 
kapegcug        EmotionalPostbase; ! dreading
kemyu           EmotionalPostbase; ! relying on someone 
kencig          EmotionalPostbase; ! respectful*
keneg           EmotionalPostbase; ! loving
kumeg           EmotionalPostbase; ! attracted to a baby 
kusgu           EmotionalPostbase; ! protective* 
kusgur          EmotionalPostbase; ! protective* 
kuygur          EmotionalPostbase; ! protective* 
nakleg          EmotionalPostbase; ! compassionate
nalluyur        EmotionalPostbase; ! unwelcome
nangru          EmotionalPostbase; ! critical
nangyar         EmotionalPostbase; ! afraid of heights
neka            EmotionalPostbase; ! emotionally pained
papsi           EmotionalPostbase; ! finding something a nuisance 
paqna           EmotionalPostbase; ! curious
peller          EmotionalPostbase; ! repulsed
pengeg          EmotionalPostbase; ! worried
qessa           EmotionalPostbase; ! disinclined to act*
qigcig          EmotionalPostbase; ! respectful
qingar          EmotionalPostbase; ! rejecting*
qitngir         EmotionalPostbase; ! dazzled
qivru           EmotionalPostbase; ! grieving*
quinag          EmotionalPostbase; ! repulsed
qumli           EmotionalPostbase; ! frustrated
qungvag         EmotionalPostbase; ! tickled
qunu            EmotionalPostbase; ! possessive*
qusva           EmotionalPostbase; ! happy
quyva           EmotionalPostbase; ! happy
quya            EmotionalPostbase; ! thankful*
takar           EmotionalPostbase; ! shy, inhibited, respectful 
takumcu         EmotionalPostbase; ! pitying, compassionate 
tallur          EmotionalPostbase; ! shy, inhibited, respectful 
temci           EmotionalPostbase; ! finding something funny 
tengru          EmotionalPostbase; ! enthusiastic*
tunrir          EmotionalPostbase; ! beholden*
tuvqa           EmotionalPostbase; ! generous
ucur            EmotionalPostbase; ! praising
ukver           EmotionalPostbase; ! believing*
ulurya          EmotionalPostbase; ! afraid of being hit
uumi            EmotionalPostbase; ! frustrated
LEXICON PosturalRoot
aatar           PosturalPostbase; ! open-mouthed 
agar            PosturalPostbase; ! hanging
aitar           PosturalPostbase; ! open-mouthed 
alar            PosturalPostbase; ! erring
amag            PosturalPostbase; ! curving
angpar          PosturalPostbase; ! open
angvar          PosturalPostbase; ! open
aqum            PosturalPostbase; ! sitting*
avler           PosturalPostbase; ! spread-legged
ayalur          PosturalPostbase; ! losing balance
callar          PosturalPostbase; ! spread open
cangur          PosturalPostbase; ! lacking symmetry
canir           PosturalPostbase; ! on the side
caqir           PosturalPostbase; ! turning
caqvir          PosturalPostbase; ! splay-footed, with shoes on the wrong feet 
cetur           PosturalPostbase; ! with legs outstretched
ciisqumig       PosturalPostbase; ! kneeling
cilig           PosturalPostbase; ! tilting
ciug            PosturalPostbase; ! with head lifted
civug           PosturalPostbase; ! with head lifted
cuqir           PosturalPostbase; ! having bends
cuqlur          PosturalPostbase; ! out of shape
elgar           PosturalPostbase; ! settled down
enlur           PosturalPostbase; ! dented
ever            PosturalPostbase; ! slanting
iggag           PosturalPostbase; ! leaning against something
igag            PosturalPostbase; ! leaning against something
ikig            PosturalPostbase; ! bending forward with buttocks projecting 
ikir            PosturalPostbase; ! open
illug           PosturalPostbase; ! tilting
inar            PosturalPostbase; ! lying down
irir            PosturalPostbase; ! tilting sideways 
isser           PosturalPostbase; ! undressed
itum            PosturalPostbase; ! breaking*
kalug           PosturalPostbase; ! empty
kamilar         PosturalPostbase; ! barefoot
kanar           PosturalPostbase; ! bending forward 
katur           PosturalPostbase; ! gathering
kiipir          PosturalPostbase; ! standing on toes 
luqir           PosturalPostbase; ! slanting
matar           PosturalPostbase; ! undressing 
melug           PosturalPostbase; ! dented
merig           PosturalPostbase; ! hemmed
mumig           PosturalPostbase; ! turned over 
nanger          PosturalPostbase; ! standing
napar           PosturalPostbase; ! upright
never           PosturalPostbase; ! lying on back 
ngel'ur         PosturalPostbase; ! dented
nungir          PosturalPostbase; ! putting on a belt 
palur           PosturalPostbase; ! lying face down 
qemag           PosturalPostbase; ! stored away 
qeter           PosturalPostbase; ! lying on back 
qungcur         PosturalPostbase; ! flexing knees 
quyur           PosturalPostbase; ! gathering
tuig            PosturalPostbase; ! turned around 
uver            PosturalPostbase; ! slanting
